Arkansas, session 2025, SB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SYSTEM AND VARIOUS DIVISIONS. There is
hereby established for the University of Arkansas - System and Various
Divisions for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, University of Arkansas 1 $562,724
(2) Vice-Pres. for Academic Affairs 1 $293,290
*HAR037*
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(3) Vice-Pres. for Finance & CFO 1 $277,184
(4) Vice-Pres. for Administration 1 $266,336
(5) Vice-Pres. for Univ. Rel. & Pub. Serv. 1 $245,793
(6) Vice-Pres. for Planning and Development 1 $245,793
(7) Vice-Pres. for Employee Benefits & Risk 1 $245,793
(8) Vice-Pres. for Lgl. Affrs. & Gen. Couns. 1 $245,793
(9) Assoc. Vice President 6 $231,416
(10) Dir. of Employee Benefits 1 $218,414
(11) Dir. of Internal Audits 3 $207,350
(12) Dir. of Plan. & Resource Services 1 $207,294
(13) Project/Program Administrator 74
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(14) Senior Assoc. General Counsel 1 $172,262
(15) Senior Institutional Audit Manager 4 $171,419
(16) Assoc. General Counsel 4 $168,773
(17) Asst. Dir. of Plng. & Res. Svcs. 1 $165,890
(18) Asst. to the President 1 $163,598
(19) Regional Audit Manager 2 $158,146
(20) Director of Administrative Services 2 $156,658
(21) Assoc. Director of Internal Audits 1 $132,139
(22) Associate Director 2 $116,587
(23) Dir. of University Information 1 $116,587
(24) Associate for Administration 3 $106,139
(25) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(26) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
ARKANSAS ARCHEOLOGICAL SURVEY
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(27) Dir. of Ar. Archeological Survey 1 $219,364
(28) State Archeologist 1 $190,172
(29) Survey Assistant Director 1 $165,829
(30) Director of Sys Prog & Database Svcs. 1 $111,761
(31) Fiscal Support Pool 2
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(32) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(33) Institutional Services Assistant 1 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(34) Archeologist Pool 25
Archeologist $189,440
Assoc. Archeologist $163,598
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Asst. Archeologist $152,037
(35) Survey Research/Professionals Pool 30
Survey Research Associate $147,952
Survey Research Assistant $100,908
Archeological Assistant $57,379
CRIMINAL JUSTICE INSTITUTE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE AND ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(36) Director, Criminal Justice Institute 1 $219,364
(37) Project/Program Administrator 24
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(38) Assoc. Dir. Criminal Justice Inst. 2 $190,172
(39) Asst. Dir., Fiscal Affairs 1 $165,890
(40) Director of Computer Serv. 1 $119,967
(41) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(42) Institutional Assistant 4 $89,980
(43) Administrative Support Pool 5
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
CLINTON SCHOOL OF PUBLIC SERVICE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE AND ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(44) Faculty - 12 month 12
Distinguished Professor $273,692
Professor $234,194
Instructor $134,719
(45) Dean of Clinton School 1 $262,913
(46) Project/Program Administrator 11
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(47) Director of Development 1 $203,773
(48) Lecturer 6 $107,878
ARKANSAS RESEARCH AND EDUCATION OPTICAL NETWORK
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(49) AREON Executive Director 1 $289,401
(50) AREON Chief Technology Officer 1 $257,245
(51) Project/Program Administrator 2
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,019
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(52) IT Pool 8
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(53) AREON Director of Admn. & Plng 1 $135,131
(54) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR MATHEMATICS,
SCIENCES, AND THE ARTS
ADMINISTRATIVE AND ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(55) Project/Program Administrator 18
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(56) IT Pool 3
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(57) ASMSA Director 1 $162,866
(58) ASMSA Dean of Academic Affairs 1 $143,224
(59) ASMSA Director of Finance 1 $139,614
(60) ASMSA Director of Human Resources 1 $132,733
(61) ASMSA Dean of Students 1 $132,675
(62) ASMSA Director of Institutional Adv. 1 $113,455
(63) ASMSA Associate Dean 3 $110,424
(64) ASMSA Dir. of Admissions & Public Aff. 1 $107,719
(65) ASMSA Computer Science Edu. Specialist 2 $106,160
(66) ASMSA Teacher 41 $104,903
(67) ASMSA Asst. Dean for Student Wellness 1 $98,294
(68) ASMSA Librarian 1 $87,426
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(69) ASMSA Coordinator for Scholar Develop. 1 $82,818
(70) ASMSA Mental Health Professional 2 $81,181
(71) ASMSA Asst. Dean for Residential Life 1 $77,297
(72) ASMSA Facility Manager 1 $75,057
(73) ASMSA Student Success Coordinator 3 $74,937
(74) ASMSA Asst. Director of Finance 1 $72,239
(75) ASMSA Residential Experience Coordinator 7 $66,254
(76) ASMSA Public Information Specialist 1 $62,447
(77) ASMSA Administrative Assistant 2 $56,091
(78) ASMSA Teacher - Part Time 5 $56,046
(79) ASMSA Registrar 1 $55,510
(80) ASMSA Admissions Specialist 3 $55,510
(81) ASMSA Residential Mentor 4 $49,691
(82) ASMSA Secretary 2 $47,733
(83) ASMSA Maintenance Supervisor 1 $45,897
(84) ASMSA Purchasing/Travel Coordinator 1 $45,751
(85) ASMSA Accounting Clerk 1 $39,732
(86) ASMSA Maintenance Worker 8 $36,120
UA GRANTHAM
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(87) Chancellor 1 $290,076
(88) Vice Chancellor 5 $250,129
(89) Vice Chan. for Enrollment Mgmt. 1 $212,570
(90) Project/Program Administrator 28
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(91) IT Pool 13
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(92) Dir. of Management Info. Systems 1 $188,816
(93) Dean 2 $173,915
(94) Director of Computer Services 1 $145,572
(95) Controller 1 $145,172
(96) Associate Director of Computing Serv. 1 $144,564
(97) Director of University Relations 1 $142,888
(98) Associate Vice Chancellor 2 $141,997
(99) Associate Controller 1 $138,313
(100) Assoc. Director Information Technology 2 $134,335
(101) Director of Enrollment Services 1 $122,249
(102) Director of Admissions 1 $111,453
(103) Institutional Research Coordinator 1 $111,362
(104) Associate Director of Admissions 2 $108,117
(105) Coordinator of Career Services 1 $104,457
(106) Director of Academic Advising 1 $104,457
(107) Instructional Designer 3 $102,700
(108) Student Development Specialist 2 $100,654
(109) Associate Director 1 $100,431
(110) Director of Student Accounts 1 $95,410
(111) Assistant Director 2 $94,523
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(112) Academic Counselor 10 $94,342
(113) Learning Center Coordinator 1 $93,419
(114) Associate Registrar 2 $88,541
(115) Coord. of Info. & Comm. Relations 1 $86,850
(116) Coordinator of Admissions 7 $86,850
(117) Assessment Coordinator 3 $86,850
(118) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(119) Academic Advisor 20 $77,184
(120) Admissions Counselor 18 $77,184
(121) Sr. Graphic Designer 1 $76,800
(122) Academic Compliance Officer 1 $73,767
(123) Accountant II 2 $72,774
(124) Asst. Dir. Financial Aid 1 $72,774
(125) HEI Program Coordinator 1 $69,975
(126) Public Information Specialist 2 $69,975
(127) Assistant Registrar 5 $67,284
(128) Financial Aid Analyst 1 $67,284
(129) Institution Human Resources Coord. 1 $67,284
(130) Student Accounts Officer 7 $67,284
(131) Financial Aid Specialist 7 $62,208
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(132) Faculty 38
Professor $153,170
Assoc. Professor $135,750
Asst. Professor $125,302
Instructor $104,389
(133) Department Chairperson 4 $146,201
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 595

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SYSTEM AND VARIOUS DIVISIONS. There is hereby
authorized, for the University of Arkansas - System and Various Divisions for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: fifty (50) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR MATHEMATICS, SCIENCES, AND
THE ARTS. There is hereby authorized, for the University of Arkansas -
Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: ten (10) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - UA GRANTHAM. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas Grantham for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
hundred fifty (250) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates
of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - SYSTEM AND VARIOUS
DIVISIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to
be payable from the University of Arkansas Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas - System and Various
Divisions for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES 11,711,463
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,161,924
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 783,137
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,656,524

SECTION 6. ALLOCATIONS. There is hereby allocated, to the various
programs of the University of Arkansas, as set out herein, the following
amounts of the funds appropriated in the State Operations - System and
Various Divisions appropriation section hereof, to the University of Arkansas
- System and Various Divisions, there to be used as provided by law, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

MAXIMUM ALLOCATION
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(1) SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION $4,684,994
(2) ARCHEOLOGICAL SURVEY 4,934,538
(3) CLINTON SCHOOL 2,500,479
(4) CRIMINAL JUSTICE INSTITUTE 3,536,513
TOTAL AMOUNT ALLOCATED $15,656,524

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - SYSTEM AND VARIOUS DIVISIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable
from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services
and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas - System and Various
Divisions for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES 14,590,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,250,000
(03) OVERTIME 92,700
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,793,400
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 20,325,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 800,000
(C) PROF. FEES 24,152,570
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 4,158,850
(07) DEBT SERVICE 4,400,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 50,000
(09) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 175,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $75,787,520

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR
MATHEMATICS, SCIENCES, AND THE ARTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas, to be payable from the School for Math, Sciences, and
Arts Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the University of
Arkansas - Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,466,931
(02) EXTRA HELP 27,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,200,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,140,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 400,000
(C) PROF. FEES 325,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 479,888
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 2,500,000
(06) LOANS/REIMBURSEMENT 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,688,819

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR
MATHEMATICS, SCIENCES, AND THE ARTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas
Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the University
of Arkansas - Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts for the
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $900,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 250,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,740,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 200,000
(C) PROF. FEES 500,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 14,000,000
(06) DEBT SERVICE 260,000
(07) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 35,000
(08) LOANS/REIMBURSEMENT 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,215,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INSTITUTE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to
be payable from the University of Arkansas Fund, for education and training
to assist the criminal justice community in addressing illicit drug
activities in the State, of the University of Arkansas - Criminal Justice
Institute for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ILLICIT DRUG EDUCATION AND TRAINING $150,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS RESEARCH AND
EDUCATION OPTICAL NETWORK. There is hereby appropriated, to the University
of Arkansas, to be payable from the University of Arkansas Fund, for
operations of the University of Arkansas - Arkansas Research and Education
Optical Network for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS RESEARCH AND EDUCATION
OPTICAL NETWORK OPERATIONS $2,100,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - ARKANSAS RESEARCH AND
EDUCATION OPTICAL NETWORK. There is hereby appropriated, to the University
of Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-
801, for personal services and operating expenses of the University of
Arkansas - Arkansas Research and Education Optical Network for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,600,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 425,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 650,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 23,000,000
(06) DEBT SERVICE 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $32,000,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - UA GRANTHAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Arkansas Grantham for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $10,200,000
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116
(02) EXTRA HELP 3,400,000
(03) OVERTIME 100,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,800,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,800,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,500,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DEBT SERVICE 2,000,000
(07) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $31,500,000

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INSTITUTE TRANSFER PROVISION. Immediately upon the effective date of
this Act the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, Treasurer of State and
Auditor of the State shall transfer on their books the sum of one hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) from the Special State Assets Forfeiture
Fund to the University of Arkansas Fund for allocation to the Criminal
Justice Institute for education and training to assist the criminal justice
community in addressing the illicit drug activities in the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.
01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037

SB116

SECTION 16. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 17. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.















01/27/2025 1:22:34 PM HAR037